lang/eshyph8y.tex
%
% 8bit Spanish hyphenation patterns for use in TeX and Groff
% with T1/LY1 encoded fonts and/or Latin1/Win1252 input encodings.
%
% (c) 2020 Luis Rivera, jlrn@@up.edu.mx || @@jarnosz at twitter, ISC Licence
% see https://opensource.org/license/ISC for details
%
\patterns{
% patterns match consonants, leaving most vowels alone...
1b 1c 1d 1f 1g 1h 1j 1k 1l 1m 1n 1^^f1 1p 1q 1r 1s 1t 1v 1w 1x 1y 1z
% from silaba.tex, Orion Technologies.
n2s1t n2s1p n2s1c b2s1t b2s1c d2s1c				% CCC
2bb 2bc 2bd 2bf 2bg 2bh 2bj 2bk     2bm 2bn		% CC
    2bp 2bq     2bs 2bt 2bv 2bw 2bx 2by 2bz
2cb 2cc 2cd 2cf 2cg     2cj 2ck     2cm 2cn
    2cp 2cq     2cs 2ct 2cv 2cw 2cx 2cy 2cz
2cht
2db 2dc 2dd 2df 2dg 2dh 2dj 2dk     2dm 2dn
    2dp 2dq     2ds 2dt 2dv 2dw 2dx 2dy 2dz
2fb 2fc 2fd 2ff 2fg 2fh 2fj 2fk     2fm 2fn
    2fp 2fq     2fs 2ft 2fv 2fw 2fx 2fy 2fz
2gb 2gc 2gd 2gf     2gh 2gj 2gk     2gm 2gn
    2gp 2gq     2gs 2gt 2gv 2gw 2gx 2gy 2gz
2jb 2jc 2jd 2jf 2jg 2jh         2jl 2jm 2jn
    2jp 2jq 2jr 2js 2jt 2jv 2jw
2lb 2lc 2ld 2lf 2lg 2lh 2lj 2lk     2lm 2ln
    2lp 2lq 2lr 2ls 2lt 2lv 2lw 2lx 2ly 2lz
2mb 2mc 2md 2mf 2mg 2mh 2mj 2mk 2ml 2mm 2mn
    2mp 2mq 2mr 2ms 2mt 2mv 2mw 2mx 2my 2mz
2nb 2nc 2nd 2nf 2ng 2nh 2nj 2nk 2nl 2nm 2nn
    2np 2nq 2nr 2ns 2nt 2nv 2nw 2nx 2ny 2nz
2pb 2pc 2pd 2pf 2pg     2pj 2pk     2pm 2pn
    2pp 2pq     2ps 2pt 2pv 2pw 2px 2py 2pz
2rb 2rc 2rd 2rf 2rg 2rh 2rj 2rk 2rl 2rm 2rn
    2rp 2rq     2rs 2rt 2rv 2rw 2rx 2ry 2rz
2sb 2sc 2sd 2sf 2sg 2sh 2sj 2sk 2sl 2sm 2sn
    2sp 2sq 2sr 2ss 2st 2sv 2sw 2sx 2sy 2sz
2tb 2tc 2td 2tf 2tg     2tj 2tk     2tm 2tn
    2tp 2tq     2ts 2tt 2tv 2tw 2tx 2ty 2tz
2xb 2xc 2xd 2xf 2xg 2xh 2xj 2xk 2xl 2xm 2xn
    2xp 2xq 2xr 2xs 2xt 2xv 2xw     2xy 2xz
2yb 2yc 2yd 2yf 2yg 2yh 2yj 2yk 2yl 2ym 2yn
    2yp 2yq 2yr 2ys 2yt 2yv 2yw 2yx     2yz
2zb 2zc 2zd 2zf 2zg 2zh 2zj 2zk 2zl 2zm 2zn
    2zp 2zq 2zr 2zs 2zt 2zv 2zw 2zx
% exceptions, from Haralambous's Latin, for Greek transliterations
b2l b2r
c2l c2r
c2h ch2l ch2r
d2l d2r
p2h ph2l ph2r % see below
g2l g2r
p2l p2r
t2l t2r
% addenda, by @jarnosz
t2h th2l th2r
f2l f2r % it was ph for f in Haralambous's Latin
r2r l2l
% cacafonias, de silaba.tex
2caca. 2cacas.							% -term
2caga. 2cagas.
2cola. 2colas.
2culo. 2culos.
2cular.
2loco. 2locos. 2loca. 2locas.
2moco. 2mocos.
2mula. 2mulas.
2pedo. 2pedos. 2peda. 2pedas.
2pito. 2pitos.
2puto. 2putos. 2puta. 2putas.
.caca2								% pref-
.pene2
a1a2 e1e2 i1i2 o1o2 u1u2					% VV
.de2s1a2 .de2s1e2 .de2s1i2 .de2s1o2 .de2s1u2			% pre- fixed by @jarnosz
.in1a2 .in1e2 .in1i2 .in1o2 .in1u2
.co1a2 .co1e2 .co1i2 .co1o2 .co1u2
.re1a2 .re1e2 .re1i2 .re1o2 .re1u2
.re2a3l % common mistake, at least in my trade.- @jarnosz
de3s2ea								% de-sea...
in2i3ci								% ini-ci...
}
\endinput
